Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3000.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 199.2, as
amended by Section 2, Chapter 317, O.S.L. 2025 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 199.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 199.2. A. 1. There is hereby re-created, to continue
until July 1, 2025 July 1, 2031, in accordance with the provisions
of the Oklahoma Sunset Law, a State Board of Cosmetology and
Barbering which shall be composed of eleven (11) members to be
appointed by the Governor and to serve at the pleasure of the
Governor.
2. One member shall be appointed from each congressional
district and the additional members shall be appointed at-large
Beginning November 1, 2026, the membership of the Board shall be
as follows:
a. one member shall have a background in law enforcement
or with an organization specializing in providing
services to victims of human trafficking,
b. one member shall be a licensed massage therapist,
c. one member shall be a licensed cosmetologist residing
in Congressional District 1 of this state,
d. one member shall be a licensed cosmetologist residing
in Congressional District 3 of this state,
e. one member shall be a licensed cosmetologist residing
in Congressional District 5 of this state,
f. one member shall be a licensed barber residing in
Congressional District 2 of this state,
g. one member shall be a licensed barber residing in
Congressional District 4 of this state,
h. one member shall be a licensed barber appointed at
large except as provided by paragraph 3 of this
subsection,
i. one member shall be a lay person who shall not be a
member of, or be related within the second degree by
ENR. H. B. NO. 3000 Page 2

affinity or consanguinity to a member of, the
cosmetology, barber, or massage therapy industry,
j. one member shall be an administrator or owner of a
public cosmetology school who shall be licensed to
teach cosmetology, barbering, or massage therapy, and
k. one member shall be an administrator or owner of a
private cosmetology school who shall be licensed to
teach cosmetology, barbering, or massage therapy.
3. However, when congressional districts are redrawn, each
member appointed prior to July 1 of the year in which such
modification becomes effective shall complete the current term of
office and appointments made after July 1 of the year in which such
modification becomes effective shall be based on the redrawn
districts. Appointments made after July 1 of the year in which such
modification becomes effective shall be from any redrawn districts
which are not represented by a board member until such time as each
of the modified congressional districts are is represented by a
board member. One member shall be a If a sixth congressional
district is drawn, the barber appointed at-large at large pursuant
to subparagraph h of paragraph 2 of this subsection shall reside in
such district beginning at the appropriate time as established by
the provisions of this paragraph.
3. 4. At the time of appointment, the members shall be citizens
United States citizens and residents of this state, at least twenty-
five (25) years of age, and shall be high school graduates. Six
members Each member specified in subparagraphs b through h of
paragraph 2 of this subsection shall, at the time of appointment,
have had at least five (5) years’ continuous practical experience in
the his or her respective practice of cosmetology in this state; one
member shall be appointed at-large and, at the time of the
appointment, have had at least five (5) years’ continuous practical
experience in the practice of barbering in this state; one member
shall be a lay person; one member shall be an administrator of a
licensed private cosmetology school; one member shall be an
administrator of a licensed barber school; and one member shall be
an administrator of a public school licensed to teach cosmetology or
barbering.
4. 5. No two members shall be graduates of the same cosmetology
school, nor shall they be organizers of or promote the organization
of any cosmetic, beauty, or hairdressers’ association. Each of the
ENR. H. B. NO. 3000 Page 3

eight cosmetology appointees appointee shall continue to be actively
engaged in the his or her respective profession of cosmetology while
serving. No two members engaged in the profession of barbering
shall be organizers of or promote the organization of any barbering
association. Each of the two barbering appointees shall continue to
be actively engaged in the profession of barbering while serving.
5. 6. If any member retires or ceases to practice his or her
profession during the term of membership on the Board, such terms
shall automatically cease and the Governor shall appoint a like-
qualified person to fulfill the remainder of the term.
B. The terms of office for Board members shall be four (4)
years ending June 30.
C. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed and
qualified.
D. Six members of the Board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business.
E. The Governor may remove any member of the Board at any time
at the Governor’s discretion. Vacancies shall be filled by
appointment by the Governor for the unexpired portion of the term.
F. The Board shall organize by electing from its membership a
chair and vice chair, each to serve for a period of one (1) year.
The presiding officer shall not be entitled to vote upon any
question except in the case of a tie vote.
Members shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary
traveling expenses as provided by the State Travel Reimbursement
Act.
G. Within thirty (30) days after the end of each fiscal year,
the Board shall make a full report to the Governor of all its
receipts and expenditures, and also a full statement of its work
during the year, together with such recommendations as the Board
deems expedient.
H. The Board may expend funds for suitable office space for the
transaction of its business. The Board shall adopt a common seal
for the use of the executive director in authenticating Board
documents.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3000 Page 4

I. The Board shall meet at its office for the transaction of
such business as may come before it on the second Monday in January,
March, May, July, September, and November and at such other times as
it may deem advisable.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 199.10, as
amended by Section 7, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 199.10), is amended to read as follows:
Section 199.10. A. All Beginning July 1, 2027, all licenses
issued under the provisions of the Oklahoma Cosmetology and
Barbering Act shall may be issued by Service Oklahoma or the State
Board of Cosmetology and Barbering and each license shall be valid
for a period of one (1) year or two (2) years if issued pursuant to
subsection D of Section 199.14 of this title. The expiration date
of the license shall be the last day of the month in which the
applicant’s birthday falls. The public display of a licensee’s
personal residential address on the face of any license issued
pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Cosmetology and Barbering
Act shall be prohibited on and after July 1, 2016, and such personal
address information, if publicly displayed on a valid license, may
be redacted by the licensee until the license is renewed and no
longer bears his or her personal residential address.
B. Applications for renewal must shall be made on or before the
last day of the month in which the applicant’s birthday falls, and
shall be accompanied by the appropriate fees.
C. Any person who fails to renew the license within the
required time may make application for renewal at any time within
five (5) years from the expiration date of the license by paying the
regular renewal license fee and a late fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00),
which becomes due two (2) months after the expiration date.
D. Any person who fails to renew within the required time may
make application with subsequent renewal and penalty fees.
E. Before a person may take an examination to renew an expired
license after a period of five (5) years may make application for
reinstatement of the license, accompanied by a reinstatement fee of
Fifty Dollars ($50.00), and the State Board of Cosmetology and
Barbering shall reinstate such license, such person shall register
in a cosmetology or barber school for the given number of review
hours in accordance with the following timetable and schedule based
upon the type of license held.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3000 Page 5

Expired Five Review
License Type Years or More Hours Required
Basic Cosmetologist 250 hours
Barber 250 hours
Master Cosmetology
Instructor 100 hours
Master Barber
Instructor 100 hours
Facial/Esthetics
Instructor 100 hours
Manicurist/Nail
Technician
Instructor 100 hours
Manicurist 100 hours
Facial Operator 100 hours
F. E. Each person holding a license shall notify the Board of
any change in the mailing address of such person within thirty (30)
days after any change.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 199.14, as
amended by Section 8, Chapter 282, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 199.14), is amended to read as follows:
Section 199.14. A. After the effective date of this act
November 1, 2024, and until June 30, 2027, the following fees shall
be charged by the State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering, and on
and after July 1, 2027, the following fees shall be charged by
Service Oklahoma:
ENR. H. B. NO. 3000 Page 6

Registration as a student.............................$10.00
Examination for license............................... $50.00
Cosmetology and Barber school license (initial)......$400.00
Cosmetology and Barber school license (renewal)......$125.00
Apprentice Registration...............................$10.00
Renewal Advanced Operator license.....................$40.00
Facial Operator license...............................$40.00
Cosmetology license (chemical/nonchemical)............$40.00
Barber license (chemical/nonchemical).................$40.00
Manicurist license....................................$40.00
Eyelash Extension Specialist certificate..............$40.00
Eyelash Extension Instructor certificate..............$40.00
Blow-Dry Styling certificate..........................$40.00
Makeup Artist certificate.............................$40.00
Facial/Esthetics Instructor license...................$45.00
Manicurist/Nail Technician Instructor license $45.00
Master Barber.........................................$40.00
Master Cosmetologist..................................$40.00
Master Cosmetology Instructor license.................$65.00
Master Barber Instructor license......................$65.00
Cosmetology establishment license (initial)...........$60.00
Cosmetology establishment license (renewal)...........$45.00
Barber establishment license (initial)................$60.00
ENR. H. B. NO. 3000 Page 7

Barber establishment license (renewal)................$45.00
Nail Salon (initial)..................................$60.00
Nail Salon (renewal)..................................$45.00
Reciprocity license (initial).........................$45.00
Reciprocity processing fee............................$45.00
Duplicate license (in case of loss or
destruction of original)............................$10.00
Notary fee.............................................$1.00
Certification of Records..............................$10.00
B. In addition to the fees specified in subsection A of this
section, the Board Service Oklahoma shall charge a total penalty of
Ten Dollars ($10.00) reinstatement fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00), as
provided for in Section 199.10 of this title.
C. Any person licensed as an advanced operator prior to July 1,
1985, may renew the advanced cosmetologist license annually by
payment of the fee required by this section and by being in
compliance with the rules promulgated by the State Board of
Cosmetology and Barbering.
D. Beginning on November 1, 2025, all licenses renewed annually
in this section shall be renewed every two (2) years. The following
fees shall be charged:
Registration as a student................................ $10.00
Examination for license.................................. $50.00
Cosmetology and Barber school license (initial)......... $400.00
Cosmetology and Barber school license (renewal)......... $250.00
Apprentice Registration.................................. $10.00
Renewal Advanced Operator license........................ $80.00
ENR. H. B. NO. 3000 Page 8

Facial Operator license.................................. $80.00
Cosmetology license (chemical/nonchemical)............... $80.00
Barber license (chemical/nonchemical).................... $80.00
Manicurist license....................................... $80.00
Eyelash Extension Specialist certificate................. $80.00
Eyelash Extension Instructor certificate................. $80.00
Blow-Dry Styling certificate............................. $80.00
Makeup Artist certificate................................ $80.00
Facial/Esthetics Instructor license...................... $90.00
Manicurist/Nail Technician Instructor license............ $45.00
Master Barber............................................ $80.00
Master Cosmetologist..................................... $80.00
Master Cosmetology Instructor license................... $130.00
Master Barber Instructor license........................ $130.00
Cosmetology establishment license (initial)............. $120.00
Cosmetology establishment license (renewal).............. $90.00
Barber establishment license (initial).................. $120.00
Barber establishment license (renewal)................... $90.00
Nail Salon (initial).................................... $120.00
Nail Salon (renewal)..................................... $90.00
Reciprocity license (initial)............................ $90.00
Reciprocity processing fee............................... $90.00
ENR. H. B. NO. 3000 Page 9

Duplicate license (in case of loss or
destruction of original)............................... $10.00
Notary fee................................................ $1.00
Certification of Records................................. $10.00
E. Compensation of a licensed operator, as defined in Section
3-102 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes, who performs functions
on behalf of Service Oklahoma for the State Board of Cosmetology and
Barbering shall be fixed by Service Oklahoma pursuant to Section 3-
103 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
F. Service Oklahoma shall retain Five Dollars ($5.00) per fee
for each license issued for a period of one (1) year and Ten Dollars
($10.00) per fee for each license issued for a period of two (2)
years. The remaining amount of such fees shall be remitted to the
Board.
G. On or before January 1, 2028, the State Board of Cosmetology
and Barbering shall remove two employee licensing positions, and
such positions shall be replaced by two employee facility inspector
positions.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 4200.4, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4200.4. A. The State Board of Cosmetology and
Barbering is hereby authorized to adopt and promulgate rules
pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act that are necessary for
the implementation and enforcement of the Massage Therapy Practice
Act, including, but not limited to, qualifications for licensure,
renewals, reinstatements, and continuing education requirements.
B. The State Board of Cosmetology and Barbering is hereby
empowered to perform investigations, to require the production of
records and other documents relating to practices regulated by the
Massage Therapy Practice Act, and to seek injunctive relief.
C. There is hereby created an Advisory Board on Massage
Therapy. The Advisory Board on Massage Therapy shall assist the
Board in carrying Upon the effective date of this act, the State
Board of Cosmetology and Barbering shall carry out the provisions of
this section regarding the qualifications, examination,
registration, regulation, and standards of professional conduct of
ENR. H. B. NO. 3000 Page 10

massage therapists. The Advisory Board on Massage Therapy shall
consist of five (5) members to be appointed by the Governor for
four-year terms as follows:
1. Three members who shall be licensed massage therapists and
have practiced in Oklahoma for not less than three (3) years prior
to their appointment;
2. One member who shall be an administrator or faculty member
of a nationally accredited school of massage therapy; and
3. One who shall be a citizen member.
D. The fee for any license issued between the effective date of
this act and May 1, 2017, shall be Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00).
The fee or renewal fee for any massage therapy license issued after
May 1, 2017, shall be Fifty Dollars ($50.00) per year. A duplicate
license fee shall be Ten Dollars ($10.00).
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 3000 Page 11

Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 3000 Page 12